cs: Typ montáže/skladování: Konzola pro volné vyplutí kategorie I; Konzola pro ruční uvolnění kategorie II; Do ruky / přenosné; Včetně pouzdra/obalu; Montážní konzola; Jiné
sv: Monterings-/förvaringstyp: Kategori I-fäste (friflytande); Kategori II-fäste (manuell frigöring); Handhållen/bärbar; Inkluderad påse/fodral; Monteringsfäste; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže/shranjevanja: Nosilec kategorije I (prosto lebdeč); Nosilec kategorije II (ročna sprostitev); Ročno / za prenašanje; Vključena torbica/etui; Montažni nosilec; Drugo
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης/αποθήκευσης: Βραχίονας ελεύθερης επίπλευσης κατηγορίας I; Βραχίονας χειροκίνητης απασφάλισης κατηγορίας II; Χειρός / μεταφοράς; Περιλαμβανόμενη θήκη/βαλιτσάκι; Βραχίονας τοποθέτησης; Άλλο
tr: Montaj/Depolama tipi: Kategori I serbest yüzer braket; Kategori II manuel serbest bırakma braketi; Elde kullanım / taşıma; Dahili kese/kılıf; Montaj braketi; Diğer
nb: Type montering/oppbevaring: Kategori I friflytbrakett; Kategori II brakett for manuell utløsning; Håndholdt / bærbar; Inkludert veske/etui; Monteringsbrakett; Annet
en: Mounting/Storage type: Category I float-free bracket; Category II manual release bracket; Handheld / carry; Included pouch/case; Mounting bracket; Other
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem/armazenamento: Suporte de liberação livre de categoria I; Suporte de liberação manual de categoria II; Portátil/de mão; Bolsa/estojo incluído; Suporte de montagem; Outros
fi: Kiinnitys-/säilytystilatyyppi: Luokan I vapautuva teline; Luokan II manuaalisesti vapautettava teline; Kannettava / kädessä pidettävä; Mukana tuleva pussi/kotelo; Kiinnitysteline; Muu
da: Monterings-/opbevaringstype: Kategori I fritflydende beslag; Kategori II beslag til manuel udløsning; Håndholdt / bærbar; Inkluderet etui/taske; Monteringsbeslag; Andet
it: Tipo di montaggio/stoccaggio: Staffa a rilascio libero di categoria I; Staffa a sgancio manuale di categoria II; Portatile / da trasporto; Custodia/borsa inclusa; Staffa di montaggio; Altro
pl: Typ montażu/przechowywania: Zwalniak hydrostatyczny kategorii I; Uchwyt ręcznego zwalniania kategorii II; Ręczne / przenośne; Etui / pokrowiec w zestawie; Uchwyt montażowy; Inne
fr: Type de montage ou de rangement: Support à largage hydrostatique de catégorie I; Support à largage manuel de catégorie II; Portatif / de transport; Pochette/étui inclus; Support de montage; Autre
ko: 장착/보관 유형: 카테고리 I 플로트프리 브래킷; 카테고리 II 수동 릴리스 브래킷; 휴대/캐리; 파우치/케이스 포함됨; 장착 브래킷; 기타
th: ประเภทการติดตั้ง/จัดเก็บ: ขายึดแบบลอยน้ำอัตโนมัติ หมวด I; ขายึดแบบปลดด้วยมือ หมวด II; ถือด้วยมือ/พกพา; กระเป๋า/เคสที่มาพร้อมกัน; ขายึดสำหรับติดตั้ง; อื่นๆ
nl: Montage-/opslagtype: Categorie I float-free beugel; Categorie II handmatige ontgrendelingsbeugel; Handheld / meedragen; Inclusief etui/koffer; Montagebeugel; Overig
hu: Rögzítési/tárolási típus: I. kategóriájú szabadon úszó (float-free) tartó; II. kategóriájú kézi kioldású tartó; Kézi / hordozható; Tartozék tasak / tok; Tartókonzol; Egyéb
de: Montage-/Aufbewahrungsart: Kategorie I Float-Free-Halterung; Kategorie II Halterung mit manueller Auslösung; Handgerät / Tragen; Inklusive Tasche/Etui; Montagehalterung; Sonstige
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže/skladištenja: Nosač kategorije I (za slobodno isplivavanje); Nosač kategorije II (s ručnim otpuštanjem); Ručno / za nošenje; Priložena torbica/kutija; Montažni nosač; Ostalo
zh-TW: 安裝/收納類型: Category I 自由漂浮托架; Category II 手動釋放托架; 手持 / 攜帶; 內附收納袋/保護殼; 安裝托架; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de montare/depozitare: Suport de eliberare automată de categoria I; Suport de eliberare manuală de categoria II; De mână / de purtat; Săculeț/husă inclus(ă); Suport de montare; Altele
ru: Тип крепления и хранения: Кронштейн категории I (свободно всплывающий); Кронштейн категории II (ручное освобождение); Ручной / переносной; Чехол/футляр в комплекте; Монтажный кронштейн; Другое
ja: 取り付け／保管タイプ: カテゴリーIフロートフリーブラケット; カテゴリーII手動リリースブラケット; 手持ち / 携帯; 付属ポーチ/ケース; マウンティングブラケット; その他
es: Tipo de montaje o almacenamiento: Soporte de zafado libre de categoría I; Soporte de liberación manual de categoría II; Portátil / para llevar; Bolsa/estuche incluido; Soporte de montaje; Otro
zh-CN: 安装/收纳类型: I 类自由漂浮支架; II 类手动释放支架; 手持/便携; 包含收纳袋/盒; 安装支架; 其他
sk-SK: Typ montáže/skladovania: Konzola kategórie I (s automatickým uvoľnením); Konzola kategórie II (s manuálnym uvoľnením); Do ruky / na prenášanie; Dodávané puzdro/obal; Montážna konzola; Iné
bg-BG: Тип монтаж/съхранение: Скоба за свободно изплаване (категория I); Скоба за ръчно освобождаване (категория II); Ръчно / за носене; Включена торбичка/калъф; Монтажна скоба; Друго
vi: Loại lắp đặt/lưu trữ: Giá đỡ nhả tự do Danh mục I; Giá đỡ nhả thủ công Danh mục II; Cầm tay / mang theo; Túi/hộp đi kèm; Giá đỡ lắp đặt; Khác
lt-LT: Montavimo / laikymo tipas: I kategorijos laisvai plūduriuojantis laikiklis; II kategorijos rankinio atleidimo laikiklis; Rankinis / nešiojamas; Pridėtas maišelis / dėklas; Tvirtinimo gembė; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem/armazenamento: Suporte de libertação livre categoria I; Suporte de libertação manual categoria II; Portátil/para transportar; Bolsa/estojo incluído; Suporte de montagem; Outro